Mississippi, session 2026, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  In addition to any other penalty provided by law for committing the offense of procuring, patronizing or promoting prostitution or any offense of human trafficking, the court shall order any person arrested to participate in the "Buyer Accountability Program" established pursuant to this act.  In addition to any fine, fee, assessment, or other penalty provided by law for any person convicted of procuring, patronizing or promoting prostitution or any offense of human trafficking, the court shall order any person participating in the "Buyer Accountability Program," to pay an assessment of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (2)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish an education program to be known as the "Buyer Accountability Program," which shall consist of an instructional program on prostitution and human trafficking schemes under the supervision and authority of the Administrative Office of Courts that is offered in one (1) or more locations throughout the State as follows: (a)  By a county or local governmental entity, alone or in partnership with a nonprofit, pertaining to the proposed operation of an instructional program by the county or local governmental entity, or alternatively, by a nonprofit or other private provider on behalf of the county or local governmental entity and the Attorney General.  If a county or local governmental entity establishes and operates an instructional program, then all courts operating within the jurisdiction of that county or local governmental entity shall order a person convicted of an eligible offense under this act to attend that county or local governmental entity's program; provided, a court shall not be required to order a person to attend that program until the first day of the month next following the date on which the Administrative Office of the Courts establishes the program; and (b)  To be established within six (6) months of the effective date of this act.  Any court in a jurisdiction that does not have an approved county or local governmental entity instructional program as established under act shall order a person charged with an eligible offense under this act to attend the approved State program established under act, unless there is an extra-jurisdictional county or local governmental entity instructional program within twenty-five (25) miles of the court, and the court has been notified in accordance with this act, of the availability of that program to accept participants from the court, in which case the court may instead order a person to attend the county or local governmental entity's instructional program.  A court shall not be required to order a person to attend a program until the first day of the month next following the date on which Administrative Office of the Courts (AOC) approves the program. (3)  The program shall include information intended to increase the person's awareness of:  (a) the causes of prostitution and its relationship to human trafficking;(b) the health and safety risks connected with prostitution, including its impact on the community; (c) the consequences of convictions for prostitution or human trafficking, including penalties for subsequent convictions on both patronizers and victims; and (d) the pervasiveness of human trafficking as well as the long-term physical and psychological harms of prostitution and human trafficking on its victims. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.